Tennessee, session 114, HB2378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
October 11 of each year is to be observed as "General Pulaski Memorial Day."
This day is not a legal holiday as defined in § 15-1-101.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011593